Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2528
Referrals.

(1) An occupational therapist may accept a referral from a licensed health care professional for the purpose of evaluation and rehabilitative treatment which may include, but not be limited to, consultation, rehabilitation, screening, prevention, and patient education services.

(2) Referrals may be for an individual case or may be for an established treatment program that includes occupational therapy services. If programmatic, the individual shall meet the criteria for admission to the program and protocol for the treatment program shall be established by the treatment team members.

(3) Referrals shall be in writing, except that oral referrals may be accepted if they are followed by a written and signed request of the person making the referral within thirty days after the day on which the patient consults with the occupational therapist.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 126;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6120;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 868.